District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.19k

Workers’ compensation for TANF recipients.

TANF recipients who are considered employees for purposes of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, approved June 25, 1938 (52 Stat. 1060; 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), shall be covered by Chapter 15 of Title 32 or subchapter XXIII of Chapter 6 of Title 1, whichever is appropriate, at the same level and to the same extent as comparably-employed individuals who do not receive TANF and shall be entitled to a minimum wage under § 32-1003.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 519k
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(w), 46 DCR 905

History

This section is referenced in § 4-205.72.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 3-205.19k.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(w) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary addition of section, see note to § 4-205.19a.

Emergency Legislation